District of Columbia statutes.
46-231

Enforcement.

This subchapter shall not be enforced until 60 calendar days after February 24, 1987.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 32, 33 DCR 6710

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-531.